sl-SI: Tekstura priboljška za hišne ljubljenčke: Žvečljiva; Hrustljava; Trdna; Mehka; Drugo
ko: 반려동물 간식 식감: 쫄깃한; 크런치; 하드; 부드러움; 기타
ro-RO: Textură gustare pentru animale de companie: Masticabilă; Crocant; Dură; Moale; Altele
vi: Kết cấu hạt dành cho thú cưng: Nhai; Cứng và giòn; Cứng; Mềm; Khác
th: เนื้อสัมผัสของอาหารสัตว์เลี้ยง: เหนียวนุ่ม; กรุบกรอบ; แข็ง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 寵物零食質地: 耐嚼; 鬆脆; 硬; 柔軟; 其他
es: Textura de golosina para mascotas: Masticable; Crujiente; Duro; Blando; Otros
cs: Textura pamlsků: Tuhé; Křupavé; Tvrdá; Měkká; Jiné
ja: ペット用おやつの食感: 噛み応えのある; カリカリ; ハード; ソフト; その他
pt-BR: Textura do petisco para animais de estimação: Mastigável; Crocante; Duro; Macio; Outro
tr: Evcil hayvan ödül maması dokusu: Çiğnenebilir; Gevrek; Sert; Yumuşak; Diğer
lt-LT: Skanėstų augintiniams tekstūra: Kramtomas; Traškus; Kietas; Minkštas; Kita
fr: Texture de friandise pour animaux de compagnie: Moelleux; Croquant; Difficile; Doux; Autre
el: Υφή λιχουδιών για κατοικίδια: Λαστιχωτή; Τραγανή; Σκληρή; Μαλακό; Άλλο
en: Pet treat texture: Chewy; Crunchy; Hard; Soft; Other
da: Tekstur af godbidder til kæledyr: Tyggehård; Sprødt; Hård; Blød; Andet
hr-HR: Tekstura poslastice za kućne ljubimce: Za žvakanje; Hrskava; Čvrsta; Meka; Ostalo
hu: Kisállat jutalomfalat textúrája: Rágható; Ropogós; Kemény; Puha; Egyéb
de: Textur der Haustierleckerlis: Zäh; Knackig; Hart; Weich; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Konzistencia pochúťok: Žuvací; Chrumkavý; Tvrdý; Mäkký; Iné
ru: Текстура лакомства для домашних животных: Жевательный; Хрустящий; Твердый; Мягкий; Другой
sv: Konsistens på husdjursgodis: Seg; Knaprig; Hård; Mjuk; Övrigt
nb: Tekstur på kjæledyrgodbit: Seig; Knasende; Hard; Myk; Annet
zh-CN: 宠物食品质地: 耐嚼零食; 酥脆零食; 硬; 软; 其他
pl: Konsystencja smakołyku dla zwierząt: Do żucia; Chrupki; Twardy; Miękki; Inne
pt-PT: Textura de guloseimas para animais de estimação: Borrachudo; Crocante; Duro; Suave; Outro
nl: Textuur huisdierentraktatie: Taai; Knapperig; Hard; Zacht; Andere
fi: Lemmikkiherkun rakenne: Sitkeä; Rapea; Kova; Pehmeä; Muu
it: Consistenza dei croccantini per animali: Gommoso; Croccante; Dura; Morbida; Altro
bg-BG: Текстура на лакомство за домашни любимци: Дъвчащ; Хрупкав; Твърд; Мек; Други